Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

25-1-1.
Making available dynamite caps or like devices to minors; criminal and civil penalties.

Any person, firm, or corporation who sells, gives, or otherwise makes available any dynamite cap or other similar device to a minor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

In addition to the punishment provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the license or permit to engage in the business of dealing in or to sell explosives of any person, firm, or corporation convicted of violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall automatically stand revoked and shall be null and void.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 306, §§ 1, 2.